Utah statutes.
72-4-123.   State highways -- SR-171 to SR-175, SR-178, SR-180.

State highways include:

(1)  SR-171.  From Route 111 at Eighty-fourth West Street and Thirty-fifth South Street easterly on Thirty-fifth South Street and Thirty-third South Street to Route 215 at the east-side belt route.

(2)  SR-172.  From 6200 South north on 5600 West to Route 80.

(3)  SR-173.  From Route 111 southeast of Magna easterly through Kearns and Murray to Route 89 at 5300 South Street in Murray.

(4)  SR-174.  From Intermountain Power Plant maingate southeasterly to Route 6 south of Lynndyl.

(5)  SR-175.  From Route 89 westerly on 11400 South to Route 154.

(6)  SR-178.  From the southbound on and off ramps of Route 15 east on 800 South in Payson to Route 198.

(7)  SR-180.  From Route 15 southeast of American Fork northerly on Fifth East Street to Route 89 in American Fork.

